src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjective inflection
! --------------------
!! The VOTIC language adjectives compare.

LEXICON Comparisons
+A+Pos:        NMN_   ;
+A+Comp+A:%>mpi      NMN_   ;
+A+Superl+A:%>     NMN_   ;

LEXICON DET_
+Det: # ;
LEXICON A_
+A: # ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
